apertium-rus-orv.orv.dix
<dictionary>   
  <alphabet>АаБбВвГгДдЖжЗзИиІіЇїЙйКкЛлМмНнОоПпРрСсТтУуФфХхЦцЧчШшЩщЪъЫыЬьЭэѠѡѢѣꙖꙗѤѥѦѧѨѩѪѫѬѭѮѯѰѱѲѳѴѵѶѷѸѹѼѽѾѿꙀꙁꙂꙃ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prb" c="problematic"/>
    <sdef n="aor" c="aorist"/>
    <sdef n="impf" c="imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pred" c="Predicative"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="part" c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="abbr" c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du" c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat" c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="acc" c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="ins" c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="prp" c="Prepositional"/>
    <sdef n="abl" c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="loc" c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="par" c="Partitive"/>
    <sdef n="short" c="Short form adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint" c="Adjective with comparative"/>
    <sdef n="cmp" c="Compound form adjective"/>
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mfn" c="Masculine / feminine / neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pers" c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="coll" c="Collective"/>
    <sdef n="neg" c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pprep" c="Pre-prepositional"/>
    <sdef n="perf" c="Perfective"/>
    <sdef n="impf" c="Imperfective"/>
    <sdef n="dual" c="Dual aspect"/>
    <sdef n="tv" c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv" c="Intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="actv" c="Active"/>
    <sdef n="pasv" c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="imper" c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pres" c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="fut" c="Future tense"/>
    <sdef n="fac" c="facultative"/>
    <sdef n="pp" c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs" c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="past" c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="nonpast" c="Present/future form for dual aspect verbs"/>
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="org" c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="hyd" c="Hydronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al" c="Altres"/>
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="percent" c="Percent"/>
    <sdef n="roman" c="Roman numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent" c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot" c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot" c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="quot" c="Quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hyphen"/>  
    <sdef n="past3p"     c="past third person"/>  
</sdefs>
<pardefs>      
  <!-- PARDEFS: Nouns -->  
  <pardef n="n_a-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ою</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ама</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ама</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ахъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="n_ja-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="n_ja-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="амиля"><p><l>амил</l><r>амиля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="армения"><p><l>армени</l><r>армения</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="биченѣгира"><p><l>биченѣгир</l><r>биченѣгира</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="блудьня"><p><l>блудьн</l><r>блудьня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="быля"><p><l>был</l><r>быля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="варвара"><p><l>варвар</l><r>варвара</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="византия"><p><l>византи</l><r>византия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="вологъда"><p><l>вологъд</l><r>вологъда</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="воля"><p><l>вол</l><r>воля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="вьсеславля"><p><l>вьсеславл</l><r>вьсеславля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="галица"><p><l>галиц</l><r>галица</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="гривьна"><p><l>гривьн</l><r>гривьна</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="гридьня"><p><l>гридьн</l><r>гридьня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="десятина"><p><l>десятин</l><r>десятина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="дорогъвля"><p><l>дорогъвл</l><r>дорогъвля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="дъмъра"><p><l>дъмър</l><r>дъмъра</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="евфимия"><p><l>евфими</l><r>евфимия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ефиопия"><p><l>ефиопи</l><r>ефиопия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="женитва"><p><l>женитв</l><r>женитва</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="захария"><p><l>захари</l><r>захария</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="звѣрина"><p><l>звѣрин</l><r>звѣрина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="игумения"><p><l>игумени</l><r>игумения</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="италия"><p><l>итали</l><r>италия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ифакина"><p><l>ифакин</l><r>ифакина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="квашьня"><p><l>квашьн</l><r>квашьня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="клятва"><p><l>клятв</l><r>клятва</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="коробъчька"><p><l>коробъчьк</l><r>коробъчька</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="коробья"><p><l>коробь</l><r>коробья</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="купьчина"><p><l>купьчин</l><r>купьчина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="куря"><p><l>кур</l><r>куря</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ливия"><p><l>ливи</l><r>ливия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ловитва"><p><l>ловитв</l><r>ловитва</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="лодья"><p><l>лодь</l><r>лодья</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="лѣзвона"><p><l>лѣзвон</l><r>лѣзвона</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="мантия"><p><l>манти</l><r>мантия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="месопотамия"><p><l>месопотами</l><r>месопотамия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="метла"><p><l>метл</l><r>метла</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="мъстъка"><p><l>мъстък</l><r>мъстъка</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="настася"><p><l>настас</l><r>настася</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="невѣнича"><p><l>невѣнич</l><r>невѣнича</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="нѣжька"><p><l>нѣжьк</l><r>нѣжька</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="обѣдьня"><p><l>обѣдьн</l><r>обѣдьня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="оскомина"><p><l>оскомин</l><r>оскомина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="осля"><p><l>осл</l><r>осля</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="паучина"><p><l>паучин</l><r>паучина</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="плиса"><p><l>плис</l><r>плиса</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="погоня"><p><l>погон</l><r>погоня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="порода"><p><l>пород</l><r>порода</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="продажа"><p><l>продаж</l><r>продажа</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="репьня"><p><l>репьн</l><r>репьня</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="руда"><p><l>руд</l><r>руда</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="сардания"><p><l>сардани</l><r>сардания</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="скудота"><p><l>скудот</l><r>скудота</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="стремя"><p><l>стрем</l><r>стремя</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="судъба"><p><l>судъб</l><r>судъба</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="трѣскота"><p><l>трѣскот</l><r>трѣскота</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="устия"><p><l>усти</l><r>устия</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="хиона"><p><l>хион</l><r>хиона</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="чисмя"><p><l>чисм</l><r>чисмя</r></p><par n="n_ja-склон_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ява"><p><l>яв</l><r>ява</r></p><par n="n_a-склон_f"/></e>
